Colorado, session 2026A, HB1015.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-548, amend
(1)(a), (3)(a), and (9); and add (1)(c) as follows:
39-22-548. Colorado homeless contribution tax credit -
legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(1) (a) In accordance with section 39-21-304 (1), which requires
each bill that creates a new tax expenditure OR EXTENDS AN EXPIRING TAX
EXPENDITURE to include a tax preference performance statement as part of
a statutory legislative declaration, the general assembly finds and declares
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

that the general legislative purpose of this tax expenditure is to induce
certain designated behavior by taxpayers. Specifically, this tax expenditure
is intended to encourage taxpayers to make contributions to approved
nonprofit organizations providing certain qualifying activities to leverage
financial contributions from Colorado residents and businesses to support
providing appropriate housing and services to assist individuals and families
experiencing homelessness. The tax expenditure will catalyze and
strengthen statewide efforts to address the effects of homelessness through
private investment and civic engagement in Colorado-based service
providers for individuals and families experiencing homelessness.
(c) IN THE FIRST YEAR THAT THE TAX EXPENDITURE WAS AVAILABLE,
EIGHT THOUSAND THREE HUNDRED TWENTY DONATIONS WITH A VALUE OF
TWENTY MILLION FOUR HUNDRED FIFTY-ONE THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED
FORTY-THREE DOLLARS WERE LEVERAGED. THE TOTAL NUMBER AND VALUE
OF DONATIONS INCREASED IN THE NEXT INCOME TAX YEAR. THEREFORE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THIS TAX EXPENDITURE HAS
SUCCESSFULLY CATALYZED AND STRENGTHENED STATEWIDE EFFORTS TO
ADDRESS THE EFFECTS OF HOMELESSNESS THROUGH PRIVATE INVESTMENT
AND CIVIC ENGAGEMENT IN COLORADO-BASED SERVICE PROVIDERS FOR
INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS AND THAT THE
TAX EXPENDITURE SHOULD BE EXTENDED INTO FUTURE INCOME TAX YEARS.
(3) (a) For income tax years commencing on or after January 1,
2023, but before January 1, 2027 JANUARY 1, 2031, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section, any taxpayer who makes a monetary or
in-kind contribution to an approved nonprofit organization, or to an
approved project administered by an approved nonprofit organization, is
allowed a credit equal to twenty-five percent of the total value of the
contribution, subject to the limitations specified in subsection (3)(d) of this
section.
(9) This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2040
DECEMBER 31, 2044.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1015

constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1015